Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.013

Classification as resident or nonresident student—Standards for determining domicile in the state—Presumptions—Cut-off date for classification application change.

(1) The establishment of a new domicile in the state of Washington by a person formerly domiciled in another state has occurred if such person is physically present in Washington primarily for purposes other than educational and can show satisfactory proof that such person is without a present intention to return to such other state or to acquire a domicile at some other place outside of Washington.

(2) Unless proven to the contrary it shall be presumed that:

(a) The domicile of any person shall be determined according to the individual's situation and circumstances rather than by marital status or sex.

(b) A person does not lose a domicile in the state of Washington by reason of residency in any state or country while a member of the civil or military service of this state or of the United States, nor while engaged in the navigation of the waters of this state or of the United States or of the high seas if that person returns to the state of Washington within one year of discharge from said service with the intent to be domiciled in the state of Washington; any resident dependent student who remains in this state when such student's parents, having theretofore been domiciled in this state for a period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution, remove from this state, shall be entitled to continued classification as a resident student so long as such student's attendance (except summer sessions) at an institution in this state is continuous.

(3) To aid the institution in deciding whether a student, parent, legally appointed guardian or the person having legal custody of a student is domiciled in the state of Washington primarily for purposes other than educational, the rules adopted by the student achievement council shall include but not be limited to the following:

(a) Registration or payment of Washington taxes or fees on a motor vehicle, mobile home, travel trailer, boat, or any other item of personal property owned or used by the person for which state registration or the payment of a state tax or fee is required will be a factor in considering evidence of the establishment of a Washington domicile.

(b) Permanent full time employment in Washington by a person will be a factor in considering the establishment of a Washington domicile.

(c) Registration to vote for state officials in Washington will be a factor in considering the establishment of a Washington domicile.

(4) After a student has registered at an institution such student's classification shall remain unchanged in the absence of satisfactory evidence to the contrary. A student wishing to apply for a change in classification shall reduce such evidence to writing and file it with the institution. In any case involving an application for a change from nonresident to resident status, the burden of proof shall rest with the applicant. Any change in classification, either nonresident to resident, or the reverse, shall be based upon written evidence maintained in the files of the institution and, if approved, shall take effect the semester or quarter such evidence was filed with the institution: PROVIDED, That applications for a change in classification shall be accepted up to the thirtieth calendar day following the first day of instruction of the quarter or semester for which application is made.

[ 2012 c 229 s 522; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 149; 1989 c 175 s 79; 1985 c 370 s 63; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 15 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 149 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 273 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 273: See note following RCW 28B.15.011.